Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 3

Dairy Farmers Prosperity Act

53-3-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Dairy Farmers Prosperity Act.”

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

Cross-References. Milk as the official state beverage, § 4-1-331.

Southern Dairy Compact, § 43-35-101 et seq.

53-3-302. Category Tennessee prime milk established.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there is established a category of milk to be known as Tennessee prime milk and to be certified as such by the department for sale at retail.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-303. “Tennessee prime milk” — Defined.

For the purposes of this part, “Tennessee prime milk” means a quantity of milk obtained by the milking of one (1) or more healthy cows, not less than eighty percent (80%) of which quantity of milk is produced in Tennessee.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 4

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-304. Certification.

Processors electing to have their milk certified as Tennessee prime milk shall make application to the department for such purpose and submit to all inspections deemed necessary by the department to attain such certification.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-305. Standards.

Tennessee prime milk sold at retail shall meet the following standards:

Reduced fat milk shall contain at least ten percent (10%) milk solids not fat (SNF);

Non-fat or skim milk shall contain at least nine percent (9%) milk solids not fat (SNF);

Whole milk shall contain at least eight and one-half percent (8.5%) milk solids not fat (SNF);

Milk set out in subdivisions (1)-(3) shall only contain milk or any other product that is produced in the United States; and

Milk set out in subdivisions (1)-(3) shall only be packaged, bottled or processed in the United States.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 6.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-306. Labeling.

The milk solids not fat (SNF) content and butterfat content shall be included on the labeling of all quantities and containers of Tennessee prime milk sold at retail.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 7.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-307. Documentation — Monthly analysis — Product samples — Costs.

Only those products meeting the standards established in § 53-3-305 shall be labeled and sold as Tennessee prime milk.

Dairy processors certified by the department to offer for sale Tennessee prime milk shall maintain documentation from a qualified laboratory acceptable to the department, such documentation to reflect monthly analyses of each product labeled Tennessee prime milk to ensure compliance with the standards established in § 53-3-305.

All such documentary records, as well as all milk procurement and milk processing records, shall be made available to the commissioner upon request.

In addition to the monthly analyses required by subsection (b), the commissioner may obtain samples of products for analyses to ensure compliance with the standards established in § 53-3-305, at the commissioner's discretion.

The cost of performing such analyses and shipment to a qualified laboratory of such samples shall be borne by the appropriate processor.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-308. Sale of milk to dairy or trade products plant.

In order to facilitate the production and sale of Tennessee prime milk, dairy cooperatives doing business in Tennessee shall sell any reasonable quantity of milk to a dairy products plant or trade products plant that processes or packages Tennessee prime milk at the request of any such plant.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 9.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

53-3-309. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of agriculture shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this part. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 10.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 627, § 12. March 3, 2010.

Chapters 4-6

[Reserved]